Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-3525
Fees.

Until January 1, 2005, a fee of two thousand dollars shall be assessed on each cask of high-level radioactive waste or transuranic waste shipped in or through the state, whether shipped by motor carrier or rail. On and after January 1, 2005, the department shall establish and assess fees on all high-level radioactive waste and transuranic waste shipped by any means in or through the state. Such fees shall be equitable and, except as otherwise provided in section 71-3526, shall be used for purposes related to (1) shipping of high-level radioactive waste and transuranic waste, including, but not limited to, inspections, escorts, and security for waste shipment, planning, and maintenance, (2) coordination of emergency response capability, (3) education and training, (4) purchase of necessary equipment, and (5) administrative costs attributable to the state agencies which are incurred as related to the shipping of high-level radioactive waste and transuranic waste. Fees assessed pursuant to this section shall be paid in advance of shipment by the shipper. Fees collected by the department under this section shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Radiation Transportation Emergency Response Cash Fund.

Laws 2003, LB 165, § 3;

Laws 2026, LB1072, § 162.
April 8, 2026